District of Columbia statutes.
4-1371.02

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Child” means an individual who is 18 years of age or younger, or up to 21 years of age if the child is a committed ward of the child welfare, intellectual and developmental disabilities, or juvenile systems of the District of Columbia.

(2)

“Committee” means the Child Fatality Review Committee.

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4602, 48 DCR 6981
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 11(a), 59 DCR 5567
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “intellectual” for “mental retardation” in (1).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Child Fatality Review Committee Establishment Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-20, September 6, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 9090).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Child Fatality Review Committee Establishment Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-40, April 25, 2001, 48 DCR 5917).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Child Fatality Review Committee Establishment Legislative Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-82, July 9, 2001, 48 DCR 6355).
Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.